Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-903
Abandonment or cruel neglect; mistreatment;
prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

(1) A person who intentionally, knowingly,
or recklessly abandons or cruelly neglects a livestock animal is guilty of
a Class I misdemeanor unless the abandonment or cruel neglect results in serious
injury or illness or death of the livestock animal, in which case it is a
Class IV felony.

(2) A person
who cruelly mistreats a livestock animal is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor
for the first offense and a Class IV felony for any subsequent offense.

Laws 2010, LB865, § 3.